test/src/morphology/V-kachkash_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


    Verb - качкаш: # Verb-аm 'eat'
     качкаш+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: качкам
     качкаш+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: качкат
     качкаш+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: качкеш
     качкаш+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: качкына
     качкаш+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: качкыда
     качкаш+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: качкыт
     
     качкаш+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: кач
     качкаш+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3+ConNeg: качеп
#  
     качкаш+V+Ind+Prt1+Sg1: качкым
     качкаш+V+Ind+Prt1+Sg2: качкыц
     качкаш+V+Ind+Prt1+Sg3: качкы
     качкаш+V+Ind+Prt1+Pl1: качна
     качкаш+V+Ind+Prt1+Pl2: качда
     качкаш+V+Ind+Prt1+Pl3: качкевӹ

     качкаш+V+Ind+Prt1+ConNeg: кач
     качкаш+V+Ind+Prt1+Pl3+ConNeg: качеп
#          
     качкаш+V+Ind+Prt2+Sg1: качкынам
     качкаш+V+Ind+Prt2+Sg2: качкынат
     качкаш+V+Ind+Prt2+Sg3: качкын
     качкаш+V+Ind+Prt2+Pl1: качкынна
     качкаш+V+Ind+Prt2+Pl2: качкында
     качкаш+V+Ind+Prt2+Pl3: качкыныт
     
## 
     качкаш+V+Ind+Prt2+Neg+Sg1: качделам
     качкаш+V+Ind+Prt2+Neg+Sg3: качделат
     качкаш+V+Ind+Prt2+Neg+Sg3: качде
     качкаш+V+Ind+Prt2+Neg+Pl1: качделна
     качкаш+V+Ind+Prt2+Neg+Pl3: качделда
     качкаш+V+Ind+Prt2+Neg+Pl3: качделыт
##   
     качкаш+V+Imprt+Sg3: кач
     качкаш+V+Imprt+Sg3: качшы
     качкаш+V+Imprt+Pl3: качда
     качкаш+V+Imprt+Pl3: качкышты
##   
     качкаш+V+ImprtII+Sg2: качкыма
     качкаш+V+ImprtII+Pl2: качкымада
##   
     качкаш+V+Des+Sg1: качнем
     качкаш+V+Des+Sg3: качнет
     качкаш+V+Des+Sg3: качнежӹ
     качкаш+V+Des+Pl1: качненӓ
     качкаш+V+Des+Pl3: качнедӓ
     качкаш+V+Des+Pl3: качнештӹ



    Verb - шӹнзӓш: # Verb-аm 'seat down'
     шӹнзӓш+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: шӹнзӓм
     шӹнзӓш+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: шӹнзӓт
     шӹнзӓш+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: шӹнзеш
     шӹнзӓш+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: шӹнзӹнӓ
     шӹнзӓш+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: шӹнзӹдӓ
     шӹнзӓш+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: шӹнзӹт
     
     шӹнзӓш+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: шӹц
     шӹнзӓш+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3+ConNeg: шӹцеп
#
     шӹнзӓш+V+Ind+Prt1+Sg1: шӹнзӹм
     шӹнзӓш+V+Ind+Prt1+Sg2: шӹнзӹц
     шӹнзӓш+V+Ind+Prt1+Sg3: шӹнзӹ
     шӹнзӓш+V+Ind+Prt1+Pl1: шӹцнӓ
     шӹнзӓш+V+Ind+Prt1+Pl2: шӹцдӓ
     шӹнзӓш+V+Ind+Prt1+Pl3: шӹнзевӹ
     
     шӹнзӓш+V+Ind+Prt1+ConNeg: шӹц
     шӹнзӓш+V+Ind+Prt1+Pl3+ConNeg: шӹцеп
#       
     шӹнзӓш+V+Ind+Prt2+Sg1: шӹнзӹнӓм
     шӹнзӓш+V+Ind+Prt2+Sg2: шӹнзӹнӓт
     шӹнзӓш+V+Ind+Prt2+Sg3: шӹнзӹн
     шӹнзӓш+V+Ind+Prt2+Pl1: шӹнзӹннӓ
     шӹнзӓш+V+Ind+Prt2+Pl2: шӹнзӹндӓ
     шӹнзӓш+V+Ind+Prt2+Pl3: шӹнзӹнӹт
##   
     шӹнзӓш+V+Ind+Prt2+Neg+Sg1: шӹцделам
     шӹнзӓш+V+Ind+Prt2+Neg+Sg3: шӹцделат
     шӹнзӓш+V+Ind+Prt2+Neg+Sg3: шӹцде
     шӹнзӓш+V+Ind+Prt2+Neg+Pl1: шӹцделна
     шӹнзӓш+V+Ind+Prt2+Neg+Pl3: шӹцделда
     шӹнзӓш+V+Ind+Prt2+Neg+Pl3: шӹцделыт
##   
     шӹнзӓш+V+Imprt+Sg3: шӹц
     шӹнзӓш+V+Imprt+Sg3: шӹцшӹ
     шӹнзӓш+V+Imprt+Pl3: шӹцдӓ
     шӹнзӓш+V+Imprt+Pl3: шӹнзӹштӹ
##   
     шӹнзӓш+V+ImprtII+Sg2: шӹнзӹмӓ
     шӹнзӓш+V+ImprtII+Pl2: шӹнзӹмӓдӓ
##   
     шӹнзӓш+V+Des+Sg1: шӹцнем
     шӹнзӓш+V+Des+Sg3: шӹцнет
     шӹнзӓш+V+Des+Sg3: шӹцнежӹ
     шӹнзӓш+V+Des+Pl1: шӹцненӓ
     шӹнзӓш+V+Des+Pl3: шӹцнедӓ
     шӹнзӓш+V+Des+Pl3: шӹцнештӹ



     
